Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-29,130
Notice and action on disposition of assets.

To dispose of assets subject to section 21-29,129:

(1) The proposed disposition shall be approved by a majority vote of the board of directors unless a greater vote is required by the articles of organization or bylaws; and

(2) The board of directors shall mail or otherwise transmit or deliver in a record to each member notice of a special meeting of the members as required by section 21-2935 that sets forth:

(a) The terms of the proposed disposition;

(b) A recommendation that the members approve the disposition unless the board determines because of conflict of interest or other special circumstances it should not make such a recommendation;

(c) If the board makes no recommendation, the basis of that decision;

(d) Any condition of its submission of the proposed disposition to the members; and

(e) Notice of the meeting in the same manner as a special members' meeting under sections 21-2935 and 21-2936.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 130.